Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Joint Operation with Municipalities

Cross references. —

As to joint operation and cooperation between districts and board of district managers, see §§

41-6-101

through

41-6-105

,

41-6-120

through

41-6-127

.

As to bonds held by state, see §§

41-6-201

through

41-6-209

.

As to determination of rights of joint users or claimants, see §§

41-6-301

through

41-6-308

.

As to contesting organization or assessments and as to limitation of actions, see §§

41-6-401

and

41-6-402

.

As to taxes and assessments and as to enforcement of liens, see §§

41-6-501

through

41-6-507

.

As to local improvements with reference to municipalities generally, see §§

15-6-101

through

15-6-609

.

As to public improvements in connection with municipalities generally, see §§

15-7-101

through

15-7-305

.

§ 41-9-401.
Agreement generally; apportionment of maintenance expenses; municipal assessments generally.

Whenever any incorporated town, city or village lies in whole or in part within the boundaries of any drainage district now organized, or which may hereafter be organized in the state of Wyoming, the commissioners of said district may enter into an agreement with said town, city or village under the terms of which said agreement, said town, city or village may agree to operate, maintain, repair or extend any drainage works lying wholly or in part within said town, city or village; and when such agreement has been entered into, said drainage district shall be relieved from the expense of operation, maintenance, extension or repairs of such drains except where any portion of the district discharges its water through the outlets diverted through said town, city or village in which case the drainage district shall assist in maintaining the said drain on a basis of land drained into said drain and said town, city or village and the individual freeholders within said town, city or village shall be relieved from the payment of assessments for operation, maintenance, repairs or extension levied by said drainage district during the life of said agreement. Such town, city or village shall thereafter levy each year, as a part of its assessment for city purposes, such amount as shall be found necessary to operate, maintain, extend or repair said drains in the same manner as is now provided for assessments for sewerage; provided, however, that any drain lying partly within said town, city or village and partly without may, by agreement between said commissioners by and with the consent of the bondholders and said town, city or village, be jointly maintained by the parties to such agreement.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 74, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-1701; W.S. 1957, § 41-467.

§ 41-9-402.
Assessments for bond principal and interest; levy and collection.

The commissioners of said drainage district, the holders of any bond or bonds of the said district and the authorities of any such town, city or village shall also enter into an agreement whereby all assessments for bond principal and interest shall be collected by such town, city or village in the same manner as is now provided by law for the collection of sewerage taxes. Upon such agreement being reached, the commissioners and bondholders of such drainage district shall furnish to said town, city or village a roll showing the lots, tracts or parcels of land within said town, city or village assessed for drainage, the assessment for benefits thereon and the assessment for construction thereon. Said town, city or village shall thereupon proceed to levy and collect such amounts as may be necessary for the payment of said assessment for construction in the same manner as is now provided by law for the levy and collection of sewerage assessments, and shall remit payments to the bondholders entitled to receive such payments upon such drainage bonds semi-annually upon the first day of January and the first day of July of each year.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 74, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-1702; W.S. 1957, § 41-468.

§ 41-9-403.
Mill levy and indebtedness of town not to be affected.

The provisions in this act [§§

41-9-401

through

41-9-403

] contained for levy, assessment and collection of drainage taxes shall not limit the mill levy of said town, city or village and the portion of said bonded debt of said drainage district assumed for collection by said town, city or village shall not be counted as a portion of the town’s indebtedness when computing whether or not the debt limit of said town, city or village has been reached.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 74, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-1703; W.S. 1957, § 41-469.